Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-907.06
Adoption,
amendment, or repeal of rule or regulation; notice to Executive Board of the
Legislative Council.

Whenever an agency proposes
to adopt, amend, or repeal a rule or regulation, (1) at least thirty days
before the public hearing, when notice of a proposed rule or regulation is
sent out, or (2) at the same time the agency applies to the Governor for a
waiver of the notice of public hearing, the agency shall send to the Executive Board of the
Legislative Council (a) a copy of the hearing notice required by section 84-907,
(b) if applicable, a draft copy of the rule or regulation, and (c) the information
provided to the Governor pursuant to section 84-907.09.

Laws 1994, LB 446, § 24;

Laws 2005, LB 373, § 5;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 228;

Laws 2013, LB222, § 43.